Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-234
Building; construction; safety regulations.

A city of the first class by ordinance may prescribe the thickness, strength, and manner of constructing stone, brick, and other buildings, and the number and construction of means of exit and entrance, and of fire escapes. It may require the keeper or proprietor of any hotel, boarding house or dormitory to provide and maintain such kind and such number of ladders, ropes, balconies, stairways, and other appliances as by ordinance may be prescribed to facilitate the escape of persons from any such building in case of fire.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XL, p. 256;

R.S.1913, § 4850;

C.S.1922, § 4018;

C.S.1929, § 16-235;

R.S.1943, § 16-234.